Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 6

Statewide Planning and Policy Council for the Department of Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities

33-5-601. Statewide planning and policy council created — Chair — Officers — Membership — Expenses — Meetings — Terms of service — Removal.

There is created the statewide planning and policy council for the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities to assist in planning a comprehensive array of high quality prevention, early intervention, treatment, and habilitation services and supports and to advise the department on policy, budget requests, and developing and evaluating services and supports.

The statewide planning and policy council shall be composed of not less than eleven (11) members, not including ex officio members. The governor shall appoint the chair of the council. The speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives shall each appoint one (1) legislator as a member of the council. The commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities shall serve, ex officio, as secretary to the council and, if the chair is not present at a meeting, shall designate a member to serve as chair for the meeting. The governor is ex officio a member of the council and may appoint representatives of state agencies as ex officio members of the council. The governor shall appoint one (1) at-large representative.

The commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities shall appoint five (5) members to represent intellectual and developmental disabilities, of which, two (2) shall be service recipients or members of families of service recipients, one (1) shall be a representative for children, one (1) shall be a intellectual and developmental disabilities service provider, and one (1) shall represent others affected by intellectual and developmental disability issues. Additionally, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities shall appoint one (1) representative for elderly service recipients and at least one (1) at-large representative.

At least a majority of the council's membership shall consist of current or former service recipients and members of service recipient families.

The members of the statewide planning and policy council shall receive no compensation.

The statewide planning and policy council shall meet quarterly at a place designated by the chair and may meet more often upon the call of the chair or a majority of the members.

Terms on the council shall be three (3) years except that the chair and members appointed by the speakers shall have terms of two (2) years.

The appointing authority may remove a member for failure to attend at least one half (½) of the scheduled meetings in any one-year period or for other good cause.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 44.

Compiler's Notes. The statewide planning and policy council for the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2022. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-243.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health (now commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services), the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

33-5-602. Duties of council.

The statewide planning and policy council shall advise the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities as to plans and policies to be followed in the service systems and the operation of the department of intellectual and development disabilities programs and facilities, recommend to the general assembly legislation and appropriations for the programs and facilities, advocate for and publicize the recommendations, and publicize generally the situation and needs of persons with intellectual or developmental disabilities and their families.

The statewide planning and policy council shall especially attend to:

Identification of common areas of concern to be addressed by the service areas;

The needs of service recipients who are children or elderly and of service recipients with combinations of intellectual or developmental disabilities and other conditions;

Evaluation of needs assessment, service, and budget proposals;

Reconciliation of policy issues among the service areas; and

Annual review of the adequacy of this title to support the service systems.

The statewide planning and policy council, in conjunction with the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, shall report annually to the governor on the service systems, including programs, services, supports, and facilities of the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and may furnish copies of the reports to the general assembly with recommendations for legislation. The statewide planning and policy council may make other reports to the governor and to the general assembly as the council deems necessary. The commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities shall make the reports available to the public, including on the Internet and by other appropriate methods.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 44.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health (now commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services), the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Cross-References. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, § 3-1-114.